Georgia, session 2025_26, HB932.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 48-7-40.1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to tax credits for
business enterprises in less developed areas, is amended by revising subsection (c) as
follows:
"(c) The commissioner of community affairs, and the commissioner of economic
development in areas qualifying under the provisions of paragraphs (1), (3), and (4) of this
subsection, also shall be authorized to include in the designation provided for in
subsection (b) of this Code section:
(1) Any area composed of ten or more contiguous census tracts which, in the opinion of
the commissioner of community affairs and the commissioner of economic development,
undergoes a sudden and severe period of economic distress caused by the closing of one
or more business enterprises located in such area;
H. B. 932
- 1 -

LC 50 0963
(2) Any area composed of one or more census tracts adjacent to a federal military
installation where pervasive poverty is evidenced by a 15 percent poverty rate or greater
as reflected in the most recent decennial census; provided, however, that the subsequent
redrawing or alteration of census tracts in a manner which results in an area no longer
being in a census tract adjacent to a federal military installation shall not disqualify an
area which has previously qualified under this paragraph if the area continues to have
pervasive poverty as described in this paragraph;
(2.1) Any census tract in a county that contains a federal military installation with a
garrison of at least 5,000 federal or military personnel combined and also contains an
industrial park that is owned and operated by a governmental entity;
(2.2) For 2025 and 2026, any census tract in a county that contains a federal military
installation with a garrison of at least 5,000 federal or military personnel;
(3) Any area composed of one or more contiguous census tracts which, in the opinion
of the commissioner of community affairs and the commissioner of economic
development, is or will be adversely impacted by the loss of one or more jobs, businesses,
or residences as a result of an airport expansion, including noise buy-outs, or the closing
of a business enterprise which, in the opinion of the commissioner of community affairs
and the commissioner of economic development, results or will result in a sudden and
severe period of economic distress; or
(4) Any area which is within or adjacent to one or more contiguous census block groups
with a poverty rate of 15 percent or greater as determined from data in the most current
United States decennial census, where the area is also included within a state enterprise
zone pursuant to Chapter 88 of Title 36 or where a redevelopment plan has been adopted
pursuant to Chapter 61 of Title 36 and which, in the opinion of the commissioner of
community affairs and the commissioner of economic development, displays pervasive
poverty, underdevelopment, general distress, and blight.
H. B. 932
- 2 -

LC 50 0963
No designation made pursuant to this subsection shall operate to displace or remove any
other area previously designated as a less developed area. Notwithstanding any provision
of this Code section to the contrary, in areas designated as suffering from pervasive poverty
under this subsection, job tax credits shall be allowed as provided in this Code section, in
addition to business enterprises, to any lawful business."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 932
- 3 -